Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,108
Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program; reimbursement rate; state plan amendment or waiver.

The Department of Health and Human Services may reimburse eligible services for the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program for at-risk mothers at an enhanced rate and shall file a state plan amendment or waiver, as necessary, no later than October 1, 2024, to implement the program.

Laws 2024, LB857, § 5.